test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VW_NoExtra_anini_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gianiniensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gianiniensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gianiniensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gianinienhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gianinienhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gianinienhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gianinienhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gianinienhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gianinienhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gianinienhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gianinienhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gianinienhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gianinienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gianinienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gianinienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gianinienhimishiniibanan
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gianinienhimishiniibanag
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gianinienhimishiniibaning
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gianinienhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gianinienhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gianinienhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oaniniensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oaniniensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oaniniensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oaniniensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oaniniensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oaniniensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oaniniensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oaniniensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oaniniensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oaniniensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oaniniensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oaniniensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oaniniensimishiniibanan
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oaniniensimishiniibanag
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oaniniensimishiniibaning
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oaniniensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oaniniensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3anini+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oaniniensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oaninienhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oaninienhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oaninienhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oaninienhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oaninienhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oaninienhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oaninienhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oaninienhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oaninienhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oaninienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oaninienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oaninienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oaninienhimishiniibanan
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oaninienhimishiniibanag
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oaninienhimishiniibaning
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oaninienhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oaninienhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3anini+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oaninienhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
